Utah statutes.
58-20a-102.   Definitions.

In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:

(1)  "Board" means the Environmental Health Scientist Board created in Section 58-20a-201.

(2)  "General supervision" means the supervising environmental health scientist is available for immediate voice communication with the person he or she is supervising.

(3)  "Practice of environmental health science" means:

(a)  the enforcement of, the issuance of permits required by, or the inspection for the purpose of enforcing state and local public health laws in the following areas:

(i)  air quality;

(ii)  food quality;

(iii)  solid, hazardous, and toxic substances disposal;

(iv)  consumer product safety;

(v)  housing;

(vi)  noise control;

(vii)  radiation protection;

(viii)  water quality;

(ix)  vector control;

(x)  drinking water quality;

(xi)  milk sanitation;

(xii)  rabies control;

(xiii)  public health nuisances;

(xiv)  indoor clean air regulations;

(xv)  institutional and residential sanitation; or

(xvi)  recreational facilities sanitation; or

(b)  representing oneself in any manner as, or using the titles "environmental health scientist," "environmental health scientist-in-training," or "registered sanitarian."

(4)  "Unlawful conduct" is as defined in Section 58-1-501.

(5)  "Unprofessional conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-20a-501 and as may be further defined by division rule.



Amended by Chapter 10, 1997 General Session

